Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5652
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act are to (1) create the Nebraska Rural Health Advisory Commission and establish its powers and duties, (2) establish a student loan program that will provide financial incentives to medical, dental, master's level and doctorate-level mental health, and physician assistant students who agree to practice their profession in a designated health profession shortage area within Nebraska, and (3) establish a loan repayment program that will require community matching funds and will provide financial incentives to eligible health professionals who agree to practice their profession in a designated health profession shortage area within Nebraska.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1223, § 55;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 47;

Laws 2000, LB 1115, § 79;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 100.